Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Employee organization" means any organization which includes as members the academic employees of a college district and which has as one of its purposes the representation of the employees in their employment relations with the college district.

(2) "Academic employee" means any teacher, counselor, librarian, or department head, who is employed by any college district, whether full or part time, with the exception of the chief administrative officer of, and any administrator in, each college district.

(3) "Administrator" means any person employed either full or part time by the college district and who performs administrative functions as at least fifty percent or more of his or her assignments, and has responsibilities to hire, dismiss, or discipline other employees. Administrators shall not be members of the bargaining unit unless a majority of such administrators and a majority of the bargaining unit elect by secret ballot for such inclusion pursuant to rules as adopted in accordance with RCW 28B.52.080.

(4) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.

(5) "Unfair labor practice" means any unfair labor practice listed in RCW 28B.52.073.

(6) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee organization which has:

(a) Been certified or recognized under this chapter as the representative of the employees in an appropriate collective bargaining unit; or

(b) Before July 26, 1987, been certified or recognized under a predecessor statute as the representative of the employees in a bargaining unit which continues to be appropriate under this chapter.

(7) "Collective bargaining" and "bargaining" mean the performance of the mutual obligation of the representatives of the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times to bargain in good faith in an effort to reach agreement with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment, such as procedures related to nonretention, dismissal, denial of tenure, and reduction in force. Prior law, practice, or interpretation shall be neither restrictive, expansive, nor determinative with respect to the scope of bargaining. A written contract incorporating any agreements reached shall be executed if requested by either party. The obligation to bargain does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or to make a concession.

In the event of a dispute between an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative over the matters that are terms and conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which items are mandatory subjects for bargaining.

[ 2019 c 230 s 2; 1991 c 238 s 146; 1987 c 314 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 12; 1973 1st ex.s. c 205 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 205: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 205 s 7.]

Public employment relations commission: Chapter 41.58 RCW.